Connecticut, session 2026, SB00325.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 1-217 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) No public agency may disclose, under the Freedom of Information
Act, from its personnel, medical or similar files, the residential address
of any of the following persons employed by such public agency:
(1) A federal court judge, federal court magistrate, judge of the
Superior Court, Appellate Court or Supreme Court of the state, or
family support magistrate;
(2) A sworn member of a municipal police department, a sworn
member of the Division of State Police within the Department of
Emergency Services and Public Protection or a sworn law enforcement
officer within the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection;
(3) An employee of the Department of Correction;
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 325
(4) An attorney-at-law who represents or has represented the state in
a criminal prosecution;
(5) An attorney-at-law who is or has been employed by the Division
of Public Defender Services or a social worker who is employed by the
Division of Public Defender Services;
(6) An inspector employed by the Division of Criminal Justice;
(7) A firefighter;
(8) An employee of the Department of Children and Families;
(9) A member or employee of the Board of Pardons and Paroles;
(10) An employee of the judicial branch;
(11) An employee of the Department of Mental Health and Addiction
Services who provides direct care to patients;
(12) A member or employee of the Commission on Human Rights
and Opportunities; [or]
(13) A state marshal appointed by the State Marshal Commission
pursuant to section 6-38b; or
(14) A school employee, as defined in section 10-222aa.
Sec. 2. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a task force to
study the issue of individuals using artificial intelligence to develop
mass requests of information under the Freedom of Information Act, as
defined in section 1-200 of the general statutes, and whether any
changes in law are necessary to assist public agencies in handling such
requests.
(b) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(1) Two appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
one of whom is a representative of an organization representing
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 325
municipalities and one of whom has expertise in open government
issues;
(2) Two appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, one of
whom is an attorney in the state and one of whom is a journalist;
(3) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives, who has expertise in artificial intelligence;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate, who is a
member of a collective bargaining organization representing teachers;
(5) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives, who is a representative of an organization representing
small towns;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate;
(7) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, or the
secretary's designee;
(8) The executive director of the Freedom of Information
Commission, or the executive director's designee;
(9) The Chief Information Officer, or a designee; and
(10) The Chief Court Administrator, or a designee.
(c) Any member of the task force appointed under subdivision (1),
(2), (3), (4), (5) or (6) of subsection (b) of this section may be a member
of the General Assembly.
(d) All initial appointments to the task force shall be made not later
than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy shall
be filled by the appointing authority.
(e) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president pro
tempore of the Senate shall select the chairpersons of the task force from
among the members of the task force. Such chairpersons shall schedule
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 325
the first meeting of the task force, which shall be held not later than sixty
days after the effective date of this section.
(f) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to government
oversight shall serve as administrative staff of the task force.
(g) Not later than January 1, 2027, the task force shall submit a report
on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
government oversight, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-
4a of the general statutes. The task force shall terminate on the date that
it submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 1-217(a)
Sec. 2 from passage New section
GOS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4